Illinois, session 104th, HB1479.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6)7    Sec. 110-6. Revocation of pretrial release, modification 8of conditions of pretrial release, and sanctions for 9violations of conditions of pretrial release. 10    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (k), when 11When a defendant has previously been granted pretrial release 12under this Section for a felony or Class A misdemeanor, that 13pretrial release may be revoked only if the defendant is 14charged with a felony or Class A misdemeanor that is alleged to 15have occurred during the defendant's pretrial release after a 16hearing on the court's own motion or upon the filing of a 17verified petition by the State.18    When a defendant released pretrial is charged with a 19violation of a protective order or was previously convicted of 20a violation of a protective order and the subject of the 21protective order is the same person as the victim in the 22current underlying matter, the State shall file a verified 23petition seeking revocation of pretrial release.   HB1479- 2 -LRB104 03491 RLC 13514 b1    Upon the filing of a petition or upon motion of the court 2seeking revocation, the court shall order the transfer of the 3defendant and the petition or motion to the court before which 4the previous felony or Class A misdemeanor is pending. The 5defendant may be held in custody pending transfer to and a 6hearing before such court. The defendant shall be transferred 7to the court before which the previous matter is pending 8without unnecessary delay, and the revocation hearing shall 9occur within 72 hours of the filing of the State's petition or 10the court's motion for revocation. 11    A hearing at which pretrial release may be revoked must be 12conducted in person (and not by way of two-way audio-visual 13communication) unless the accused waives the right to be 14present physically in court, the court determines that the 15physical health and safety of any person necessary to the 16proceedings would be endangered by appearing in court, or the 17chief judge of the circuit orders use of that system due to 18operational challenges in conducting the hearing in person. 19Such operational challenges must be documented and approved by 20the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 21challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented and 22approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 23every 6 months. 24    The court before which the previous felony matter or Class 25A misdemeanor is pending may revoke the defendant's pretrial 26release after a hearing. During the hearing for revocation,   HB1479- 3 -LRB104 03491 RLC 13514 b1the defendant shall be represented by counsel and have an 2opportunity to be heard regarding the violation and evidence 3in mitigation. The court shall consider all relevant 4circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature and 5seriousness of the violation or criminal act alleged. The 6State shall bear the burden of proving, by clear and 7convincing evidence, that no condition or combination of 8conditions of release would reasonably ensure the appearance 9of the defendant for later hearings or prevent the defendant 10from being charged with a subsequent felony or Class A 11misdemeanor. 12    In lieu of revocation, the court may release the defendant 13pre-trial, with or without modification of conditions of 14pretrial release.15    If the case that caused the revocation is dismissed, the 16defendant is found not guilty in the case causing the 17revocation, or the defendant completes a lawfully imposed 18sentence on the case causing the revocation, the court shall, 19without unnecessary delay, hold a hearing on conditions of 20pretrial release pursuant to Section 110-5 and release the 21defendant with or without modification of conditions of 22pretrial release.23    Both the State and the defendant may appeal an order 24revoking pretrial release or denying a petition for revocation 25of release.26    (b) If a defendant previously has been granted pretrial   HB1479- 4 -LRB104 03491 RLC 13514 b1release under this Section for a Class B or Class C misdemeanor 2offense, a petty or business offense, or an ordinance 3violation and if the defendant is subsequently charged with a 4felony that is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's 5pretrial release or a Class A misdemeanor offense that is 6alleged to have occurred during the defendant's pretrial 7release, such pretrial release may not be revoked, but the 8court may impose sanctions under subsection (c). 9    (c) The court shall follow the procedures set forth in 10Section 110-3 to ensure the defendant's appearance in court if 11the defendant:12        (1) fails to appear in court as required by the 13    defendant's conditions of release;14        (2) is charged with a felony or Class A misdemeanor 15    offense that is alleged to have occurred during the 16    defendant's pretrial release after having been previously 17    granted pretrial release for a Class B or Class C 18    misdemeanor, a petty or business offense, or an ordinance 19    violation that is alleged to have occurred during the 20    defendant's pretrial release;21        (3) is charged with a Class B or C misdemeanor 22    offense, petty or business offense, or ordinance violation 23    that is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's 24    pretrial release; or 25        (4) violates any other condition of pretrial release 26    set by the court.   HB1479- 5 -LRB104 03491 RLC 13514 b1    In response to a violation described in this subsection, 2the court may issue a warrant specifying that the defendant 3must appear before the court for a hearing for sanctions and 4may not be released by law enforcement before that appearance. 5    (d) When a defendant appears in court pursuant to a 6summons or warrant issued in accordance with Section 110-3 or 7after being arrested for an offense that is alleged to have 8occurred during the defendant's pretrial release, the State 9may file a verified petition requesting a hearing for 10sanctions.11    (e) During the hearing for sanctions, the defendant shall 12be represented by counsel and have an opportunity to be heard 13regarding the violation and evidence in mitigation. The State 14shall bear the burden of proving by clear and convincing 15evidence that:16        (1) the defendant committed an act that violated a 17    term of the defendant's pretrial release;18        (2) the defendant had actual knowledge that the 19    defendant's action would violate a court order;20        (3) the violation of the court order was willful; and21        (4) the violation was not caused by a lack of access to 22    financial monetary resources.23    (f) Sanctions for violations of pretrial release may 24include:25        (1) a verbal or written admonishment from the court;26        (2) imprisonment in the county jail for a period not   HB1479- 6 -LRB104 03491 RLC 13514 b1    exceeding 30 days;2        (3) (Blank); or3        (4) a modification of the defendant's pretrial 4    conditions.5    (g) The court may, at any time, after motion by either 6party or on its own motion, remove previously set conditions 7of pretrial release, subject to the provisions in this 8subsection. The court may only add or increase conditions of 9pretrial release at a hearing under this Section.10    The court shall not remove a previously set condition of 11pretrial release regulating contact with a victim or witness 12in the case, unless the subject of the condition has been given 13notice of the hearing as required in paragraph (1) of 14subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 15and Witnesses Act. If the subject of the condition of release 16is not present, the court shall follow the procedures of 17paragraph (10) of subsection (c-1) of the Rights of Crime 18Victims and Witnesses Act.19    (h) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 20Attorney's office of all hearings under this Section as 21required in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of 22the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be 23informed of their opportunity at these hearings to obtain a 24protective order.25    (i) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 26the State's ability to file a verified petition seeking denial   HB1479- 7 -LRB104 03491 RLC 13514 b1of pretrial release under subsection (a) of Section 110-6.1 or 2subdivision (d)(2) of Section 110-6.1.3    (j) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant before 4the court, the judge must find that continued detention under 5this Section is necessary to reasonably ensure the appearance 6of the defendant for later hearings or to prevent the 7defendant from being charged with a subsequent felony or Class 8A misdemeanor. 9    (k) Upon petition of the State's Attorney of a county 10prosecuting a defendant on pretrial release or upon motion of 11the court, the court may revoke or impose sanctions on a 12defendant who is released on pretrial release if the defendant 13has violated any of the conditions of pretrial release. 14(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.)